District of Columbia statutes.
3-2502

Repealed

Licenses — Examination of applicants; issuance.

Repealed.

June 18, 1898, 30 Stat. 477, ch. 467, § 2
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261,§ 1237, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-2102.
1973 Ed., § 2-1402.